Oklahoma, session 2026, SB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-403 of Title 43A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Emergency opioid antagonist” means a drug including, but
not limited to, naloxone that blocks the effects of opioids and that
is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for
the treatment of an opioid overdose; and
2. “Person” means, unless the context otherwise requires, any
individual, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability
company, governmental entity, tribal entity, public or private
institution of postsecondary education, or other legal entity.

B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any
person may:
1. Possess and store emergency opioid antagonists;
2. Acquire emergency opioid antagonists by purchase or
donation;
3. Distribute or make emergency opioid antagonists available to
any person to the extent permitted under applicable federal law; and
4. Administer an emergency opioid antagonist to any person who
the person believes, in good faith, is experiencing an opioid
overdose.
C. A person shall not be subject to criminal prosecution for
possessing, storing, acquiring, distributing, making available, or
administering emergency opioid antagonists pursuant to this section.
D. Any person who, in good faith, distributes, makes available,
or administers emergency opioid antagonists pursuant to this section
shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or
omissions by such person, except for acts or omissions constituting
gross negligence or willful or wanton wrongs in distributing, making
available, or administering emergency opioid antagonists.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 65 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 65 Page 3